Vermont, session 2025-2026, H32.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. LEGISLATIVE INTENT
It is the intent of the General Assembly that inmates with opioid use
disorder receive the same coordinated, accessible, and evidence-based
treatment for opioid use disorder in a correctional facility as provided by
Vermont’s hub and spoke community system.
Sec. 2. 28 V.S.A. § 801 is amened to read:
§ 801. MEDICAL CARE OF INMATES
(a) Provision of medical care. The Department shall provide health care for
inmates in accordance with the prevailing medical standards. When the
provision of such care requires that the inmate be taken outside the boundaries
of the correctional facility wherein the inmate is confined, the Department
VT LEG #379111 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.32
2025 Page 3 of 16
shall provide reasonable safeguards, when deemed necessary, for the custody
of the inmate while the inmate is confined at a medical facility.
(b) Screenings and assessments.
(1) Upon admission to a correctional facility for a minimum of 14
consecutive days, each inmate shall be given a physical assessment unless
extenuating circumstances exist.
(2) Within 24 hours after admission to a correctional facility, each
inmate shall be screened for substance use disorders as part of the initial and
ongoing substance use screening and assessment process. This process
includes screening and assessment for opioid use disorders.
* * *
(e) Pre-existing prescriptions; definitions for subchapter.
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, an inmate who is
admitted to a correctional facility while under the medical care of a licensed
physician, a licensed physician assistant, or a licensed advanced practice
registered nurse and who is taking medication at the time of admission
pursuant to a valid prescription as verified by the inmate’s pharmacy of record,
primary care provider, other licensed care provider, or as verified by the
Vermont Prescription Monitoring System or other prescription monitoring or
information system, including buprenorphine, methadone, or other medication
prescribed in the course of medication for opioid use disorder, shall be entitled
VT LEG #379111 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.32
2025 Page 4 of 16
to continue that medication and to be provided that medication by the
Department pending an evaluation by a licensed physician, a licensed
physician assistant, or a licensed advanced practice registered nurse or in the
case of medication for opioid use disorder, a provider serving the correctional
facility in accordance with a memorandum of understanding executed pursuant
to subsection 801b(a) of this title.
(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this subsection, the Department
may defer provision of a validly prescribed medication in accordance with this
subsection if, in the clinical judgment of a licensed physician, a physician
assistant, or an advanced practice registered nurse, or in the case of medication
for opioid use disorder, a provider serving the correctional facility in
accordance with a memorandum of understanding executed pursuant to
subsection 801b(a) of this title, it is not medically necessary to continue the
medication at that time.
(3) The A licensed practitioner who makes making the clinical judgment
to discontinue a medication that is not prescribed in the course of medication
for opioid use disorder shall cause the reason for the discontinuance to be
entered into the inmate’s medical record, specifically stating the reason for the
discontinuance. The inmate shall be provided, both orally and in writing, with
a specific explanation of the decision to discontinue the medication and with
notice of the right to have the inmate’s community-based prescriber notified of
VT LEG #379111 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.32
2025 Page 5 of 16
the decision. If the inmate provides signed authorization, the Department shall
notify the community-based prescriber in writing of the decision to discontinue
the medication.
(4) It is not the intent of the General Assembly that this subsection shall
create a new or additional private right of action.
(5) As used in this subchapter:
(A) “Medically necessary” describes health care services that are
appropriate in terms of type, amount, frequency, level, setting, and duration to
the individual’s diagnosis or condition,; are informed by generally accepted
medical or scientific evidence,; and are consistent with generally accepted
community practice parameters. Such services shall be informed by the unique
needs of each individual and each presenting situation and shall include a
determination that a service is needed to achieve proper growth and
development or to prevent the onset or worsening of a health condition.
(B) “Medication for opioid use disorder” has the same meaning as in
18 V.S.A. § 4750.
(f) Third-party medical provider contracts. Any contract between the
Department and a provider of physical or mental health services shall establish
policies and procedures for continuation and provision of medication at the
time of admission and thereafter, as determined by an appropriate evaluation,
which will protect the health of inmates.
VT LEG #379111 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.32
2025 Page 6 of 16
(g) Prescription medication; reentry planning.
(1) If Except with regard to medication for opioid use disorder, if an
offender inmate takes a prescribed medication while incarcerated and that
prescribed medication continues to be both available at the facility and
clinically appropriate for the offender inmate at the time of discharge from the
correctional facility, the Department or its contractor shall provide the offender
inmate, at the time of release, with not less than a 28-day supply of the
prescribed medication, if possible, to ensure that the inmate may continue
taking the medication as prescribed until the offender inmate is able to fill a
new prescription for the medication in the community. The Department or its
contractor shall also provide the offender inmate exiting the facility with a
valid prescription to continue the medication after any supply provided during
release from the facility is depleted.
(2) The Unless otherwise specified in section 801b of this title, the
Department or its contractor shall identify any necessary licensed health care
provider or substance use disorder treatment program, or both, and schedule an
intake appointment for the offender inmate with the provider or program to
ensure that the offender inmate can continue care in the community as part of
the offender’s inmate’s reentry plan. The Department or its contractor may
employ or contract with a case worker or health navigator to assist with
scheduling any health care appointments in the community.
VT LEG #379111 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.32
2025 Page 7 of 16
Sec. 3. 28 V.S.A. § 801b is amended to read:
§ 801b. MEDICATION FOR OPIOID USE DISORDER IN
CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES
(a) If an inmate receiving medication for opioid use disorder prior to
entering the correctional facility continues to receive medication prescribed in
the course of medication for opioid use disorder pursuant to section 801 of this
title, the inmate shall be authorized to receive that medication for as long as
medically necessary Memorandum of understanding. The Department of
Corrections shall execute a memorandum of understanding with the opioid
treatment program nearest each correctional facility in the State for the
provision of services for inmates with opioid use disorder, including
medication for opioid use disorder. The Department may also execute a
memorandum of understanding with one or more office-based opioid treatment
providers within reasonable proximity to a correctional facility in the State for
the provision of services to inmates with opioid use disorder, including
medication for opioid use disorder. To the extent feasible, each memorandum
of understanding shall require the parties to adhere to the Department of
Health’s “Rule Governing Medication for Opioid Use Disorder for: (1) Office-
Based Opioid Treatment Providers Prescribing Buprenorphine; and (2) Opioid
Treatment Providers” (CVR 13-140-062). Each memorandum of
understanding shall ensure continuity of care for inmates with opioid use
VT LEG #379111 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.32
2025 Page 8 of 16
disorder from the time of entry through release from a correctional facility.
Memorandums of understanding entered into by the Department pursuant to
this section shall expand access to a full range of medications for opioid use
disorder at each correctional facility in the State, including opioid antagonists
where clinically appropriate.
(b)(1) Initiation of medication for opioid use disorder. If at any time an
inmate screens positive as having an opioid use disorder, the inmate may elect
to commence buprenorphine-specific medication for opioid use disorder if it is
deemed medically necessary by a provider authorized to prescribe
buprenorphine serving the correctional facility in accordance with a
memorandum of understanding executed pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section. The inmate shall be authorized to receive the medication for opioid
use disorder as soon as possible and for as long as medically necessary.
(2) Nothing in this subsection shall prevent an inmate who commences
medication for opioid use disorder while in a correctional facility from
transferring from buprenorphine to methadone if:
(A) methadone is deemed medically necessary by a provider
authorized to prescribe methadone; and
(B) the inmate elects to commence methadone as recommended by a
provider authorized to prescribe methadone to a new type of medication for
opioid use disorder when the provider serving the correctional facility in
VT LEG #379111 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.32
2025 Page 9 of 16
accordance with a memorandum of understanding executed pursuant to
subsection (a) of this section determines the transfer is medically necessary and
the inmate provides informed consent to the new type of medication.
(c) Continuation of medication for opioid use disorder. If an inmate
receiving medication for opioid use disorder prior to entering the correctional
facility continues to receive medication prescribed in the course of medication
for opioid use disorder pursuant to section 801 of this title, the inmate shall be
authorized to receive that medication for as long as medically necessary as
determined by the provider serving the correctional facility in accordance with
a memorandum of understanding executed pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section.
(c)(d) Discontinuation of medication for opioid use disorder. The licensed
practitioner who makes the clinical judgment A provider serving the
correctional facility in accordance with a memorandum of understanding
executed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall determine whether it is
medically necessary to discontinue a medication for opioid use disorder. If it
is so determined, the provider shall cause the reason for the discontinuance to
be entered into the inmate’s medical record, specifically stating the reason for
the discontinuance. The inmate shall be provided, both orally and in writing,
with a specific explanation of the decision to discontinue the medication. and
with The inmate shall also receive notice of the right to have the inmate’s
VT LEG #379111 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.32
2025 Page 10 of 16
community-based prescriber notified of the decision, if the inmate was
inducted on medication for opioid use disorder prior to incarceration. If the
inmate provides signed authorization, the Department shall notify the
community-based prescriber in writing of the decision to discontinue the
medication.
(d)(1)(e) Reentry planning and case management. As part of reentry
planning, the Department shall commence medication for opioid use disorder
prior to an offender’s release if:
(A) the offender screens positive for an opioid use disorder;
(B) medication for opioid use disorder is medically necessary; and
(C) the offender elects to commence medication for opioid use
disorder
(1) The Department shall develop an individualized reentry plan for
each inmate transitioning to the community who is receiving medication for
opioid use disorder at the time of release that addresses housing, employment,
mental health services, and other social determinants of health. The plan shall
facilitate continuity of care related to the individual’s opioid use disorder for a
minimum of six months after an inmate’s release from a correctional facility.
Each individualized reentry plan shall:
(A) require the Department to schedule appointments with an opioid
treatment program or office-based opioid treatment provider in the same region
VT LEG #379111 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.32
2025 Page 11 of 16
as an inmate’s residence at the time of the inmate’s release, including follow-
up appointments;
(B) ensure that each inmate reentering the community receives a
discharge summary detailing all referral appointments and a list of regionally
appropriate resources for individuals with opioid use disorder;
(C) require that all inmates transitioning to the community who are
receiving medication for opioid use disorder at the time of release receive not
less than a seven-day supply of the medication to bridge the gap until the
individual’s first post-incarceration visit at an opioid treatment program or
office-based opioid treatment provider and a valid prescription to continue the
medication for opioid use disorder after the medication supplied at the time of
release from the correctional facility is depleted; and
(D) ensure that a case manager monitors the individual’s adherence
to treatment for opioid use disorder and provides support for long-term
recovery.
(2) If medication for opioid use disorder is indicated and despite best
efforts induction is not possible prior to release, the Department shall ensure
comprehensive care coordination with a community-based provider an
individualized reentry plan is developed for the individual in accordance with
subdivision (1) of this subsection.
VT LEG #379111 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.32
2025 Page 12 of 16
(3) If an offender takes a prescribed medication as part of medication for
opioid use disorder while incarcerated and that prescription medication is both
available at the facility and clinically appropriate for the offender at the time of
discharge from the correctional facility, the Department or its contractor shall
provide the offender, at the time of release, with a legally permissible supply to
ensure that the offender may continue taking the medication as prescribed prior
to obtaining the prescription medication in the community.
(e)(1)(f) Counseling and behavioral therapy. Counseling or behavioral
therapies shall be provided in conjunction with the use of medication for
medication-assisted treatment opioid use disorder as provided for in the
Department of Health’s “Rule Governing Medication for Opioid Use Disorder
for: (1) Office-Based Opioid Treatment Providers Prescribing Buprenorphine;
and (2) Opioid Treatment Providers.”
(2) As part of reentry planning, the Department shall inform and offer
care coordination to an offender to expedite access to counseling and
behavioral therapies within the community.
(3) As part of reentry planning, the Department or its contractor shall
identify any necessary licensed health care provider or an opioid use disorder
treatment program, or both, and schedule an intake appointment for the
offender with the providers or treatment program, or both, to ensure that the
offender can continue treatment in the community as part of the offender’s
VT LEG #379111 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.32
2025 Page 13 of 16
reentry plan. The Department or its contractor may employ or contract with a
case worker or health navigator to assist with scheduling any health care
appointments in the community.
(g) Reporting. Annually, on or before January 15, the Department shall
submit a report to the House Committee on Corrections and Institutions and to
the Senate Committee on Judiciary addressing:
(1) the number of individuals during the prior year who received
medication for opioid use disorder in a correctional facility by medication type;
(2) recidivism rates for individuals receiving medication for opioid use
disorder while in a correctional facility;
(3) cost analysis and savings related to reduced recidivism, health care
expenditures, and criminal justice expenses for individuals who received
medication for opioid use disorder while in a correctional facility, if
applicable; and
(4) health and social outcomes for individuals receiving medication for
opioid use disorder while in a correctional facility at six-months post release.
(h) Training. The Department shall ensure that all staff involved in the
administration of medication for opioid use disorder or support of inmate’s
receiving medication for opioid use disorder complete annual training on the
benefits of medication for opioid use disorder, protocols related to the
administration and storage of medication for opioid use disorder, and any
VT LEG #379111 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.32
2025 Page 14 of 16
security concerns related to the use of medication for opioid use disorder in a
correctional facility. Trainings conducted pursuant to this subsection shall be
developed in conjunction with providers serving a correctional facility in
accordance with a memorandum of understanding executed pursuant to
subsection (a) of this section.
(i) As used in this section:
(1) Office-based opioid treatment provider” means a provider, as
defined by 18 V.S.A. § 9402, that prescribes medication for opioid use
disorder pursuant to federal and State law, federal regulation, and State rule,
and that is not an opioid treatment program. An office-based opioid treatment
provider may include a preferred provider, a specialty addiction practice, an
individual provider practice, or several providers practicing as a group.
(2) “Opioid treatment program” means a specialty treatment program or
practitioner registered under 21 U.S.C. § 823(g)(1) engaged in the treatment of
individuals with opioid use disorder, including dispensing medication, such as
methadone and buprenorphine, to treat opioid use disorder under controlled
and observed conditions.
(3) “Preferred provider” means an entity that has attained a certificate
from the Department of Health and has an existing contract or grant from the
Department of Health to provide substance use disorder treatment.
VT LEG #379111 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.32
2025 Page 15 of 16
Sec. 4. REPORT; OPIOID TREATMENT PROGRAM CERTIFICATION
(a) On or before January 15, 2026, the Department of Corrections shall
submit a report to the House Committee on Corrections and Institutions and to
the Senate Committee on Judiciary containing a plan to obtain federal
certification for opioid treatment programs at all correctional facilities in
accordance with 42 C.F.R. Part 8 and transition from the memorandums of
understanding executed between opioid treatment programs, office-based
opioid treatment providers, and correctional facilities pursuant to this act to in-
house opioid use disorder services, including medication for opioid use
disorder.
(b) As used in this section, “opioid treatment program” has the same
meaning as in 28 V.S.A. § 801b.
Sec. 5. GRANTS; MEDICATION FOR OPIOID USE DISORDER IN
CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES
(a) The Department of Corrections shall seek and apply for federal and
State grants to support the memorandums of understanding executed between
opioid treatment programs, office-based opioid treatment providers, and
correctional facilities pursuant to this act, including grants for provider and
staff training, technology improvements, and the development of infrastructure
necessary for care coordination.
VT LEG #379111 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.32
2025 Page 16 of 16
(b) As used in this section, “opioid treatment program” and “office based
opioid treatment provider” have the same meaning as in 28 V.S.A. § 801b.
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379111 v.1